Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-112
Officers and employees; salaries; how fixed.

There shall be paid to each of the several officers, except the speaker, named in section 50-111 for their official services such salaries as shall be fixed by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, unless otherwise directed by the Legislature.

Laws 1867, § 3, p. 85;

R.S.1913, § 3754;

Laws 1919, c. 118, § 1, p. 283;

C.S.1922, § 3147;

C.S.1929, § 50-113;

Laws 1937, c. 116, § 1, p. 418;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-113;

R.S.1943, § 50-112;

Laws 1945, c. 120, § 1, p. 396;

Laws 1947, c. 346, § 1, p. 1091;

Laws 1951, c. 338, § 1, p. 1116;

Laws 1953, c. 358, § 1, p. 1136;

Laws 1955, c. 198, § 1, p. 563;

Laws 1957, c. 220, § 1, p. 759;

Laws 1959, c. 241, § 1, p. 829;

Laws 1959, c. 425, § 2, p. 1428;

Laws 1963, c. 304, § 2, p. 900;

Laws 1967, c. 328, § 7, p. 871;

Laws 1973, LB 82, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 485, § 2.

If additional employees of Legislature are desired, statute must be so framed as to authorize their employment. State ex rel. Squires v. Wallichs, 14 Neb. 439, 16 N.W. 481 (1883).